Illinois, session 104th, HB5001.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 356g as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/356g)  (from Ch. 73, par. 968g)7    Sec. 356g. Mammograms; mastectomies.8    (a) Every insurer shall provide in each group or 9individual policy, contract, or certificate of insurance 10issued or renewed for persons who are residents of this State, 11coverage for screening by low-dose mammography for all 12patients 35 years of age or older for the presence of occult 13breast cancer within the provisions of the policy, contract, 14or certificate. The coverage shall be as follows:15        (1) A baseline mammogram for patients 35 to 39 years 16    of age.17        (2) An annual mammogram for patients 40 years of age 18    or older.19        (3) A mammogram at the age and intervals considered 20    medically necessary by the patient's health care provider 21    for patients under 40 years of age and having a family 22    history of breast cancer, prior personal history of breast 23    cancer, positive genetic testing, or other risk factors.  HB5001 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 15320 BAB 28474 b1        (4) For an individual or group policy of accident and 2    health insurance or a managed care plan that is amended, 3    delivered, issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2020 4    (the effective date of Public Act 101-580) and before the 5    effective date of this amendatory Act of the 103rd General 6    Assembly, a comprehensive ultrasound screening and MRI of 7    an entire breast or breasts if a mammogram demonstrates 8    heterogeneous or dense breast tissue or when medically 9    necessary as determined by a physician licensed to 10    practice medicine in all of its branches.11        (4.3) For an individual or group policy of accident 12    and health insurance or a managed care plan that is 13    amended, delivered, issued, or renewed on or after the 14    effective date of this amendatory Act of the 103rd General 15    Assembly, a comprehensive ultrasound screening and MRI of 16    an entire breast or breasts if a mammogram demonstrates 17    heterogeneous or dense breast tissue or when medically 18    necessary as determined by a physician licensed to 19    practice medicine in all of its branches, advanced 20    practice registered nurse, or physician assistant. 21        (4.5) For a group policy of accident and health 22    insurance that is amended, delivered, issued, or renewed 23    on or after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 24    the 103rd General Assembly, molecular breast imaging (MBI) 25    of an entire breast or breasts if a mammogram demonstrates 26    heterogeneous or dense breast tissue or when medically   HB5001 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 15320 BAB 28474 b1    necessary as determined by a physician licensed to 2    practice medicine in all of its branches, advanced 3    practice registered nurse, or physician assistant. 4        (5) A screening MRI when medically necessary, as 5    determined by a physician licensed to practice medicine in 6    all of its branches.7        (6) For an individual or group policy of accident and 8    health insurance or a managed care plan that is amended, 9    delivered, issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2020 10    (the effective date of Public Act 101-580), a diagnostic 11    mammogram when medically necessary, as determined by a 12    physician licensed to practice medicine in all its 13    branches, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician 14    assistant. 15    A policy subject to this subsection shall not impose a 16deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or any other cost-sharing 17requirement on the coverage provided; except that this 18sentence does not apply to coverage of diagnostic mammograms 19to the extent such coverage would disqualify a high-deductible 20health plan from eligibility for a health savings account 21pursuant to Section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code (26 22U.S.C. 223). 23    For purposes of this Section:24    "Diagnostic mammogram" means a mammogram obtained using 25diagnostic mammography. 26    "Diagnostic mammography" means a method of screening that   HB5001 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 15320 BAB 28474 b1is designed to evaluate an abnormality in a breast, including 2an abnormality seen or suspected on a screening mammogram or a 3subjective or objective abnormality otherwise detected in the 4breast. 5    "Low-dose mammography" means the x-ray examination of the 6breast using equipment dedicated specifically for mammography, 7including the x-ray tube, filter, compression device, and 8image receptor, with radiation exposure delivery of less than 91 rad per breast for 2 views of an average size breast. The 10term also includes digital mammography and includes breast 11tomosynthesis. As used in this Section, the term "breast 12tomosynthesis" means a radiologic procedure that involves the 13acquisition of projection images over the stationary breast to 14produce cross-sectional digital three-dimensional images of 15the breast.16    If, at any time, the Secretary of the United States 17Department of Health and Human Services, or its successor 18agency, promulgates rules or regulations to be published in 19the Federal Register or publishes a comment in the Federal 20Register or issues an opinion, guidance, or other action that 21would require the State, pursuant to any provision of the 22Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 23111-148), including, but not limited to, 42 U.S.C. 2418031(d)(3)(B) or any successor provision, to defray the cost 25of any coverage for breast tomosynthesis outlined in this 26subsection, then the requirement that an insurer cover breast   HB5001 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 15320 BAB 28474 b1tomosynthesis is inoperative other than any such coverage 2authorized under Section 1902 of the Social Security Act, 42 3U.S.C. 1396a, and the State shall not assume any obligation 4for the cost of coverage for breast tomosynthesis set forth in 5this subsection.6    (a-5) Coverage as described by subsection (a) shall be 7provided at no cost to the insured and shall not be applied to 8an annual or lifetime maximum benefit.9    (a-10) When health care services are available through 10contracted providers and a person does not comply with plan 11provisions specific to the use of contracted providers, the 12requirements of subsection (a-5) are not applicable. When a 13person does not comply with plan provisions specific to the 14use of contracted providers, plan provisions specific to the 15use of non-contracted providers must be applied without 16distinction for coverage required by this Section and shall be 17at least as favorable as for other radiological examinations 18covered by the policy or contract.19    (a-15) Notwithstanding any age requirement set forth in 20this Section, coverage shall be consistent with evidence-based 21clinical guidelines, including, but not limited to, guidelines 22established by the National Comprehensive Cancer Network, and 23shall be provided in accordance with the determination of a 24health care provider. Nothing in this subsection shall be 25construed to limit coverage otherwise required under this 26Section based on age.   HB5001 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 15320 BAB 28474 b1    (b) No policy of accident or health insurance that 2provides for the surgical procedure known as a mastectomy 3shall be issued, amended, delivered, or renewed in this State 4unless that coverage also provides for prosthetic devices or 5reconstructive surgery incident to the mastectomy. Coverage 6for breast reconstruction in connection with a mastectomy 7shall include:8        (1) reconstruction of the breast upon which the 9    mastectomy has been performed;10        (2) surgery and reconstruction of the other breast to 11    produce a symmetrical appearance; and12        (3) prostheses and treatment for physical 13    complications at all stages of mastectomy, including 14    lymphedemas.15Care shall be determined in consultation with the attending 16physician and the patient. The offered coverage for prosthetic 17devices and reconstructive surgery shall be subject to the 18deductible and coinsurance conditions applied to the 19mastectomy, and all other terms and conditions applicable to 20other benefits. When a mastectomy is performed and there is no 21evidence of malignancy then the offered coverage may be 22limited to the provision of prosthetic devices and 23reconstructive surgery to within 2 years after the date of the 24mastectomy. As used in this Section, "mastectomy" means the 25removal of all or part of the breast for medically necessary 26reasons, as determined by a licensed physician.  HB5001 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 15320 BAB 28474 b1    Written notice of the availability of coverage under this 2Section shall be delivered to the insured upon enrollment and 3annually thereafter. An insurer may not deny to an insured 4eligibility, or continued eligibility, to enroll or to renew 5coverage under the terms of the plan solely for the purpose of 6avoiding the requirements of this Section. An insurer may not 7penalize or reduce or limit the reimbursement of an attending 8provider or provide incentives (monetary or otherwise) to an 9attending provider to induce the provider to provide care to 10an insured in a manner inconsistent with this Section.11    (c) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 12if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 13accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative 14Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint 15Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 16adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized.17(Source: P.A. 103-808, eff. 1-1-26.) 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 191, 2028.